Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2247
Ombudsman advocate, defined.

Ombudsman advocate means an employee or a volunteer of the office other than the state long-term care ombudsman or of a local program trained and certified to carry out duties of the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 9.
April 12, 2018